Utah statutes.
13-22-16.   Separate accounts and receipts required.
(1)  Each organization required to be registered under this chapter and each
professional fund raiser shall segregate and maintain all contributed funds in
an account held separately from its operating account.  Each contribution in
the control or custody of the professional solicitor shall, in its entirety
and within ten days of its receipt, be deposited in an account at a bank or
other federally insured financial institution which shall be in the name of
the charitable organization.  The charitable organization shall maintain and
administer the account and shall have sole control of all withdrawals.
(2)  Each organization required to be registered under this chapter and each
professional fund raiser shall maintain and use duplicate receipts for
contributions of money, securities, and cash equivalents so that one receipt
is issued to each contributor and one is maintained by the charitable
organization.
